Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1407
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; youth advisory council; parent advisory board; host activities; employment.

Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall (1) have a youth advisory council and parent advisory board composed of community members to provide ongoing feedback to ensure services remain relevant, effective, and responsive, (2) host regular outreach events, workshops, and open houses in partnership with schools, faith-based groups, and community organizations, to create a bridge for preventive engagement with at-risk youth and their families, and (3) employ individuals with established community ties and lived experience to guide youth and families through available services, act as mentors, and assist with follow-up to ensure sustained engagement.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 7.